Hawaii, session 2025, GM1367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that many low-income
households struggle to purchase food due to Hawaii's high cost
of living and food prices. The supplemental nutrition
assistance program (SNAP), formerly known as the food stamp
program, is crucial to providing necessary food assistance to
some of Hawaii's most economically disadvantaged residents.
The legislature further finds that SNAP is the most
effective anti-hunger initiative in the country. In Hawaii,
SNAP supports over one hundred thirty thousand individuals,
bringing more than $630,000,000 into the State's economy each
year. These benefits help economically vulnerable households
meet their basic nutritional needs without sacrificing their
financial security.
The legislature additionally finds that a study co-authored
by the university of Hawaii economic research organization and
Hawaii Public Health Institute found that eliminating the net
income limit criteria for SNAP beneficiaries would provide an
2025-2824 SB960 GDI SMA-l.docx
■lillllMinillllillllMIH

Page 2 S.B. NO. S.1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
additional $45,000,000 in benefits to struggling families across
the State and expand eligibility for thirteen thousand to
fourteen thousand more households, with each household receiving
an average of $3,200 annually in food assistance. In September
2024, Governor Josh Green subsequently announced that the State
would remove the net income limit criteria to strengthen
Hawaii's social welfare system for working-class families.
The legislature also finds that SNAP access and
participation rates are hampered by understaffing at the
department of human services. Improvements to SNAP in the
State, including elimination of the net income limit, will only
be effective if they are able to be fully implemented, which
will require additional staffing for the department of human
services. Moreover, since SNAP benefits are federally
reimbursable, increasing staff to increase the State's SNAP
program's participation rate could generate hundreds of millions
of dollars in federal revenue to combat food insecurity in local
communities.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate
funds to the department of human services to enhance access to
2025-2824 SB960 GDI SMA-l.docx
iiiiiiiiniiiiiiiioiiiniiDiin

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
and participation in the supplemental nutrition assistance
program.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,100,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 to strengthen access to the supplemental nutrition
assistance program by:
(1) Authorizing differential pay increases for positions
related to the facilitation of the supplemental
nutrition assistance program;
(2) Establishing new positions to improve access to the
supplemental nutrition assistance program,
particularly for economically disadvantaged
communities; and
(3) Undertaking any other programs or initiatives the
department of human services deems effective in
improving supplemental nutrition assistance program
participation rates.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of human services for the purposes of this Act.
2025-2824 SB960 CDl SMA-l.docx 3

Page 4 960
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2824 SB960 CDl SMA-l.docx

s.B. NO. S:
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 1st day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 960, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
111

SB No. 960, SD 1,HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives